test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-sakken_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 
# Orthographic variation in consonant length


  Verb - sakken: # Verb 'to sink / to fall' - full paradigm
     sakken+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sakke
     sakken+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: sakst
     sakken+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sakt
     sakken+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [sakket, sakken]
     sakken+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [sakket, sakken]
     sakken+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [sakket, sakken]

     sakken+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: sakde
     sakken+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: sakdest
     sakken+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: sakde
     sakken+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: sakden
     sakken+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: sakden
     sakken+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: sakden

     sakken+V+Inf:  sakken
     sakken+V+PrfPrc:  sakked
     sakken+V+PrsPrc:  sakken

     sakken+V+Imprt+Sg2:  sak
     sakken+V+Imprt+Pl2:  sakket
